Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1302.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Debt Interest Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Health care provider." Any of the following:(1) A health care provider, as defined in section 1201 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) An emergency medical services agency, as defined 12345678910111213141516 under 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions)."Medical debt." An obligation to pay money arising from the receipt of health care services."Medical debt collector." One of the following:(1) A person engaged in the business of collecting or attempting to collect, directly or indirectly, medical debts originally owed or due or asserted to be owed or due to another person.(2) A person who purchases a medical debt for collection purposes, whether the person collects the debt itself or hires a third party for collection or an attorney for litigation to collect the debt.Section 3. Limitation on medical debt interest.No health care provider or medical debt collector in this Commonwealth may charge an interest rate exceeding 6% on medical debt.Section 4. Penalties.(a) Unfair or deceptive act or practice.--A violation of section 3 constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(b) Injunction.--An individual may bring an action in court for injunctive or other appropriate equitable relief to enforce the provisions of this act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1302PN1496 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526